New York, session 2025-2026, A6461.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 8 and 23 of section 352 of the economic devel- 2 opment law, as amended by section 1 of part K of chapter 59 of the laws 3 of 2017, are amended to read as follows: 4 8. "Financial services data centers or financial services customer 5 back office operations" means operations that manage the data or 6 accounts of existing customers or provide product or service information 7 and support to customers of financial services companies, including 8 banks, other lenders, securities and commodities brokers and dealers, 9 investment banks, portfolio managers, trust offices, [and] insurance 10 companies, and financial technology companies that develop distributed 11 ledger technology. For purposes of this subdivision "distributed ledger 12 technology" means a mathematically secured, chronological, and decen- 13 tralized consensus ledger or database, whether maintained via internet 14 interaction, peer-to-peer network, or otherwise used to authenticate, 15 record, share and synchronize transactions in their respective electron- 16 ic ledgers or databases. 17 23. "Software development" means the creation of distributed ledger 18 technology, coded computer instructions or production or post-production 19 of video games, as defined in subdivision one-a of section six hundred 20 eleven of the general business law, other than those embedded and used 21 exclusively in advertising, promotional websites or microsites, and also 22 includes new media as defined by the commissioner in regulations. For 23 purposes of this subdivision "distributed ledger technology" means a 24 mathematically secured, chronological, and decentralized consensus EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10150-01-5 A. 6461 2 1 ledger or database, whether maintained via internet interaction, peer- 2 to-peer network, or otherwise used to authenticate, record, share and 3 synchronize transactions in their respective electronic ledgers or data- 4 bases. 5 § 2. Section 354 of the economic development law is amended by adding 6 a new subdivision 6 to read as follows: 7 6. The commissioner shall strive to ensure that there is participation 8 on a broad regional geographic basis within the program and outreach to 9 all eligible industries defined in section three hundred fifty-two of 10 this article. The commissioner shall also promote diverse ownership and 11 workforces of participating businesses through outreach to businesses 12 owned by people with disabilities as defined under subdivision twenty- 13 one of section two hundred ninety-two of the executive law or subdivi- 14 sions three and twenty-two of section 1.03 of the the mental hygiene 15 law, minority- and women-owned businesses and veteran-owned businesses 16 in those industries where their participation is not currently preva- 17 lent. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.